Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2327.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 201 and 302 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 201. Powers and Duties of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall exercise in the manner provided by this act all powers granted to him by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon him by this act, which shall include the following:123456789101112131415161718192021222324 * * *(f.3) To develop a uniform naming convention for election districts that each county board of elections shall follow.(f.4) To update the naming convention described in subsection (f.3), as needed.* * *Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(a.1) To assign and input election district names as determined by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2327PN3102 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516